FauxFur.xfst
# Remove tags, turn placeholders to IPA
define Pretty [ GENTAGS | %+ ] -> 0 .o.
%[PalatalJ%] -> ɟ .o.
%[PalatalN%] -> ɲ .o.
%[Engma%] -> ŋ ;

define Readable [ GENTAGS | %+ ] -> 0 ;

read regex Morphology .o. Gen 
.o. LinearityVV .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityCV .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityBetweenMorphemes .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoBL .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityWithinMorpheme .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityCC .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoSonTSon .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. IdentVoice .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. StrongRootInitCons .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. IdentNasal .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. Pretty
.o. Readable
;

#echo Real order
echo Forms of /lat/

echo **
echo lat+1st+Sing+Perfect
down lat+1st+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo lat+2nd+Sing+Perfect
down lat+2nd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo lat+3rd+Sing+Perfect
down lat+3rd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo lat+1st+Pl+Perfect
down lat+1st+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo lat+2nd+Pl+Perfect
down lat+2nd+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo lat+3rd+Pl+Perfect
down lat+3rd+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo Forms of /ba/

echo **
echo ba+1st+Sing+Perfect
down ba+1st+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo ba+2nd+Sing+Perfect
down ba+2nd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo ba+3rd+Sing+Perfect
down ba+3rd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo ba+1st+Pl+Perfect
down ba+1st+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo ba+2nd+Pl+Perfect
down ba+2nd+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo ba+3rd+Pl+Perfect
down ba+3rd+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo Forms of /mul/

echo **
echo mul+1st+Sing+Perfect
down mul+1st+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo mul+2nd+Sing+Perfect
down mul+2nd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo mul+3rd+Sing+Perfect
down mul+3rd+Sing+Perfect

echo **
echo mul+1st+Pl+Perfect
down mul+1st+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo mul+2nd+Pl+Perfect
down mul+2nd+Pl+Perfect

echo **
echo mul+3rd+Pl+Perfect
down mul+3rd+Pl+Perfect

#read regex Morphology .o. Gen 
#.o. IdentNasal .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. StrongRootInitCons .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. Linearity .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. NoBL .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. IdentVoice .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. NoSonTSon .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. Pretty
#;

#echo Reordered
#echo Forms of /lat/
#
#echo **
#echo lat+1st+Sing+Perfect
#down lat+1st+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo lat+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#down lat+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo lat+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#down lat+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo lat+1st+Pl+Perfect
#down lat+1st+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo lat+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#down lat+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo lat+3rd+Pl+Perfect
#down lat+3rd+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo Forms of /ba/
#
#echo **
#echo ba+1st+Sing+Perfect
#down ba+1st+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo ba+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#down ba+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo ba+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#down ba+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo ba+1st+Pl+Perfect
#down ba+1st+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo ba+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#down ba+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo ba+3rd+Pl+Perfect
#down ba+3rd+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo Forms of /mul/
#
#echo **
#echo mul+1st+Sing+Perfect
#down mul+1st+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo mul+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#down mul+2nd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo mul+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#down mul+3rd+Sing+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo mul+1st+Pl+Perfect
#down mul+1st+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo mul+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#down mul+2nd+Pl+Perfect
#
#echo **
#echo mul+3rd+Pl+Perfect
#down mul+3rd+Pl+Perfect
